Utah statutes.
10-6-119.   Budgets in effect for budget period -- Amendment -- Filing for public inspection.

Upon final adoption, the budgets shall be in effect for the budget period, subject to later amendment. A certified copy of the adopted budgets shall be filed in the office of the city auditor or city recorder and shall be available to the public during regular business hours.

